Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 5
QUALIFICATIONS FOR OFFICE AND METHODS OF NOMINATION

Editor's note:

Articles 1 to 13 were repealed and reenacted in 1980, and this part 5 was subsequently repealed and reenacted in 1992, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 5 prior to 1992, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume and the editor's note following the title heading. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated in 1992. For a detailed comparison of articles 1 to 13 for 1980 and this part 5 for 1992, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

1-4-501. Only eligible electors eligible for office.

No person except an eligible elector who is at least eighteen years of age, unless another age is required by law, is eligible to hold any office in this state. No person is eligible to be a designee or candidate for office unless that person fully meets the qualifications of that office as stated in the constitution and statutes of this state on or before the date the term of that office begins. The designated election official shall not certify the name of any designee or candidate who fails to swear or affirm under oath that he or she will fully meet the qualifications of the office if elected; or who is unable to provide proof that he or she meets any requirements of the office relating to registration, residence, or property ownership; or who the designated election official determines is not qualified to hold the office that he or she seeks based on residency requirements. The information found on the person's voter registration record is admissible as prima facie evidence of compliance with this section.

No person is eligible to be a candidate for more than one office at one time; except that this subsection (2) does not apply to memberships on different special district boards. This subsection (2) shall not prohibit a candidate or elected official of any political subdivision from being a candidate or member of the board of directors of any special district or districts in which he or she is an eligible elector, unless otherwise prohibited by law.

The qualification of any candidate may be challenged by an eligible elector of the political subdivision within five days after the designated election official's statement is issued that certifies the candidate to the ballot. The challenge shall be made by verified petition setting forth the facts alleged concerning the qualification of the candidate and shall be filed in the district court in the county in which the political subdivision is located. The hearing on the qualification of the candidate shall be held in not less than five nor more than ten days after the date the election official's statement is issued that certifies the candidate to the ballot. The court shall hear the testimony and other evidence and, within forty-eight hours after the close of the hearing, determine whether the candidate meets the qualifications for the office for which the candidate has declared. Provisions of section 13-17-101, C.R.S., regarding frivolous, groundless, or vexatious actions shall apply to this section.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 677, § 5, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 1153, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 829, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-209), ch. 234, p. 946, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-4-501 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For electors only eligible to office, see also § 6 of art. VII, Colo. Const.; for disqualifications from holding office of trust or profit, see § 4 of art. XII, Colo. Const.

1-4-502. Methods of nomination for partisan candidates.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (3) of this section, nominations for United States senator, representative in congress, governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, state treasurer, attorney general, member of the state board of education, regent of the university of Colorado, member of the general assembly, district attorney, and all county officers to be elected at the general election may be made by primary election under section 1-4-101 or by assembly or convention under section 1-4-702 by major political parties, by petition for nomination as provided in section 1-4-802, or by a minor political party as provided in section 1-4-1304.

Nominations for presidential electors to be elected at the general election and for candidates to fill vacancies to unexpired terms of representatives in congress to be elected at a congressional vacancy election may be made by a convention of a political party, or by a committee authorized by the convention, or by petition for nomination of an unaffiliated candidate as provided in parts 8 and 9 of this article.

For general elections:

The nomination of a major political party for lieutenant governor shall be made by the party's candidate for governor. No later than seven days after the official statewide election results for the primary election are certified pursuant to section 1-10-105 (1), the party's candidate for governor shall select a candidate for lieutenant governor and shall file a written nomination of the candidate with the secretary of state. Other nominations for the office of lieutenant governor may be made by petition for nomination of an unaffiliated candidate as provided in section 1-4-802 or by a minor political party as provided in section 1-4-1304 (2).

No person shall be eligible for a major political party nomination for lieutenant governor unless such person is a registered elector and has been affiliated with the major political party making the nomination, as shown in the record books of the county clerk and recorder, no later than the first business day of the January immediately preceding the election for which the person desires to be placed in nomination.

Any person nominated as the candidate for lieutenant governor of a major political party pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section shall file a written acceptance with the secretary of state by mail or hand delivery. The written acceptance must be postmarked or received by the secretary of state within thirty days after the nomination. If an acceptance is not filed within the required time, the candidate is deemed to have declined the nomination, and the nomination must be treated as a vacancy to be filled as provided in part 10 of this article 4.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 677, § 5, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 860, § 115, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 256, § 6, effective April 13.

L. 2000:

(1) amended and (3) added, p. 2027, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 1309, § 6, effective April 22.

L. 2010:

(3)(b) amended, (HB 10-1271), ch. 324, p. 1501, § 2, effective May 27.

Initiated 2016:

(1) amended, Proposition 108, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 27, 2016. See L. 2017, p. 2823.

L. 2017:

IP(3) and (3)(c) amended, (SB 17-209), ch. 234, p. 962, § 7, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(3)(a) and (3)(c) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3010, § 16, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(3)(a) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1639, § 14, effective June 21.

1-4-503. Method of nomination for nonpartisan candidates.

Nominations for all elected nonpartisan local government officials must be by petition for nomination as provided in part 8 of this article.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 678, § 5, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 450, § 4, effective August 4.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 72, § 36, effective February 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 1-4-502 and 1-4-801 as they existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

(1) For filing of petitions and certificates of designation of assembly, see § 1-4-604.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

1-4-504. Documents are public records.

All certificates of designation, petitions, certificates of nomination, acceptances, declinations, and withdrawals are public records as soon as they are filed and are open to public inspection under proper regulation. When a copy of any document is presented at the time the original is filed or at any time thereafter and a request is made to have a copy compared and certified, the officer with whom the document is filed shall forthwith compare the copy with the original on file and, if necessary, correct the copy and certify and deliver the copy to the person who presented it upon the payment in advance of the copy and certification charge. All filed documents shall be preserved pursuant to section 1-7-802, unless otherwise ordered or restrained by some court.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 678, § 5, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-4-503 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For statutes pertaining to public records generally, see article 72 of title 24; for filing of petitions and certificates of designation of assembly, see § 1-4-604.